Utah statutes.
31A-19a-407.   Cooperation among rating organizations and insurers
(1)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-19a-305, rate service organizations and
insurers may cooperate with each other in rate-making or in other matters
within the scope of this part.
(2) (a)  The commissioner may review the cooperative activities and practices
permitted under Subsection (1).
(b)  If, after a hearing, the commissioner finds any of the cooperative
activities or practices permitted under Subsection (1) to be unfair,
unreasonable, or otherwise inconsistent with the law, the commissioner may
issue an order:
(i)  specifying in what respects the activity or practice is unfair,
unreasonable, or otherwise inconsistent with the law; and
(ii)  requiring the persons or entities involved to discontinue the activity
or practice.
